District of Columbia statutes.
6-206

Representation.

The Authority shall be represented by its General Counsel and other attorneys, as necessary, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, shall not be subject to the oversight of the Corporation Counsel for the District government.

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 7, 47 DCR 1325
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 6-201.